test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_oneform_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - one form: # from dictionary
  
    saddađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saddaa
    vardađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vardaa
    arvađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arvaa
    pavŋađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pavŋaa
    njaddeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njadda
    sparkkeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sparkka
    karreeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kara
    sohtâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sahta
    savveeđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sava
    kopšâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kapša
    sovđâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: savđa
    pahadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahaad
    tamadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tammaad
    skavadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skaavaad
    čalmadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čalmad
    sappadiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sappad
    ovdediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oovded
    tabediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tabbeed
    ucediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ucceed
    kobdediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kobdeed
    aldediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aldeed
    sundediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sundeed
    turdediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turdeed
    kuhediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuhheed
    nulhediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nulheed
    morhediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: morheed
    majediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maajeed
    pajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paajeed
    stajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: staajeed
    vajediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaijeed
    stäjediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stääjeed
    siskediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siskeed
    jyelediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jyeleed
    vyelediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyeleed
    julediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: julleed
    timediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiimeed
    kalmediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kalmeed
    kimediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kimmeed
    tumediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tummeed
    ronediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ronneed
    čerediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeereed
    pyerediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pyereed
    styerediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: styereed
    hurediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurreed
    turediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuureed
    pusediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pusseed
    pintediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pintteed
    tavediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: taaveed
    rievediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rieveed
    avediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: avveed
    kovediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kovveed
    mieđediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mieđeed
    maŋediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maŋŋeed
    saŋediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saŋŋeed
    išediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iššeed
    turgediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turged
    uhkediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uhked
    pilkkediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pilkked
    toskediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tosked
    tuhlediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuhled
    pillediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pilled
    sormediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sormed
    muvrediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuvred
    kivsediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiivsed
    mittediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mitted
    vijđediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viijđed
    täbidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tääbbid
    hälbidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häälbid
    sälbidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: säälbid
    čyerbidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čyerbid
    leiccidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: leiccid
    verdidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: verdid
    hävdidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hävdid
    segidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seeggid
    räigidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rääigid
    tähidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: täähid
    huridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuriid
    havriidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: havriid
    kuárjidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárjid
    läjidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lääjid
    päjidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pääjid
    stäjidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stääjid
    nyeskidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nyeskid
    häskidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hääskid
    pelidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peellid
    kevlidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kevlid
    šyeimidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šyeimid
    rämidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: räämid
    skyennidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skyennid
    särnidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: särnid
    uánidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uánid
    mänidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: määnid
    epidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eeppid
    kepidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keeppid
    täpidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tääppid
    meridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meerrid
    kuáridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárrid
    tuáridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuárrid
    väridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: väärrid
    fievridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fievrid
    nievridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nievrid
    huávridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrid
    veisidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veisid
    suálssidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suálssid
    täsidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: täässid
    kehtidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kehtid
    pestittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pestid
    kuástidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuástid
    västidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: västid
    häittidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häittid
    teividiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teivid
    väividiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vääivid
    pälvidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: päälvid
    servidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: servid
    härvidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häärvid
    lävvidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lävvid
    hävidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häävvid
    kezidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keezzid
    vyebdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juvâstuvvâid
    rähtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toppiittuvvâid
    repčidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: repčid
    käržidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kääržid
    kečidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keeččid
    mečidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: meeččid
    viešidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vieššid
    älššidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: älššid
    ruáđidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruáđđid
    räđidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: rääđđid
    täŋidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tääŋŋid
    kuocijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuocijd
    kulgijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuulgijd
    čergijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeergijd
    purgijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puurgijd
    hajijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haajijd
    vinjijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viinjijd
    unjijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uunjijd
    ruojijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruojijd
    halijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haalijd
    skalijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skaalijd
    palijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paalijd
    helijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heelijd
    kelijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keelijd
    vielijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vielijd
    cilijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciilijd
    skilijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiilijd
    skolijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoolijd
    šolijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šoolijd
    culijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuulijd
    hulijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huulijd
    julijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juulijd
    mulijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muulijd
    pulijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puulijd
    kemijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: keemijd
    jomijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joomijd
    somijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: soomijd
    humijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huumijd
    jumijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juumijd
    toohâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huámmášumijd
    poossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paanijd
    ruonijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruonijd
    harijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haarijd
    šarijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šaarijd
    čerijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeerijd
    cirijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciirijd
    lirijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liirijd
    šnjirijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šniirijd
    širijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiirijd
    njorijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njoorijd
    škorijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: škoorijd
    sporijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: spoorijd
    torijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: toorijd
    hurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huurijd
    jurdijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juurijd
    škurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: škuurijd
    murijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muurijd
    turijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuurijd
    šurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuurijd
    havrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrijd
    kovrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koovrijd
    čuovrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuovrijd
    visijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viisijd
    josijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: joosijd
    mosijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moosijd
    opsijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oopsijd
    lasettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: resurssijd
    poossâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liitijd
    movtijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moovtijd
    vavijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaavijd
    šavijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šaavijd
    skovijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skoovijd
    šuvijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuuvijd
    kizijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiizijd
    puzijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puuzijd
    rađijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raađijd
    skičijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiičijd
    škiŋijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: škiiŋijd
    liđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liiđijd
    piŋijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piiŋijd
    rišijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: riišijd
    skerčijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skeerčijd
    kuđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuuđijd
    šuđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuuđijd
    sevđijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevđijd
    pargeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pargeeld
    ponjeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poonjeeld
    siskeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siskeeld
    oskeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oskeeld
    raseldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: raaseeld
    naveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: naaveeld
    siveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siiveeld
    njoveldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooveeld
    rođeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: roođeeld
    šoršeldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šorššeeld
    puáibildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáibild
    suáibildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suáibild
    perbildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: peerbild
    pierbildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pierbild
    vyestildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vyestild
    sevtildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: seevtild
    uáivildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: uáivild
    jävildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jäävvild
    kävildiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: käävild
    jogâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jooggâld
    vajâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaajâld
    spejâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: speejâld
    pivâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piivâld
    piervâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piervâld
    puđâldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puuđâld
    paimândiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paaimând
    njaddodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njaddod
    suddodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suddod
    šlundodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlundod
    turdodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: turdod
    lijgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lijgod
    sijgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sijgod
    ilbodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ilbood
    jalgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalgood
    kolgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolgood
    targodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: targood
    lojodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: loijood
    jaskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jaskood
    fiskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fiskood
    viskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viskood
    moskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moskood
    kiškodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiškood
    njuškodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njuškood
    ruškodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ruškood
    ilodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: illood
    himodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: himmood
    pinodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pinnood
    orodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oorood
    karodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: karrood
    irodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: irrood
    kasodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kassood
    hitodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hittood
    hurtodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurttood
    tivodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiivood
    kočodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: koččood
    sparrodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sparrod
    fastodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fastod
    kištodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kištod
    iberdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ibbeerd
    mogerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moggeerd
    piškerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: piškeerd
    komerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kommeerd
    kaverdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaaveerd
    kazerdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kazzeerd
    skuiperdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuuiperd
    käđirdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kääđird
    kiđordiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiiđord
    skuážurdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skuážžurd
    šlobârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šloobbârd
    kuobârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuobbârd
    teibârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: teeibârd
    timbârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiimbârd
    jumbârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juumbârd
    šumbârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuumbârd
    njocârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooccârd
    pancârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paancârd
    šladârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šlaaddârd
    mudârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muuddârd
    vandârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaandârd
    havdârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavdârd
    suogârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suoggârd
    maigârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maaigârd
    vaigârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vaaigârd
    moigârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mooigârd
    pugârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puugârd
    šavgârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šaavgârd
    puljârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puuljârd
    sinjârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siinjârd
    vinjârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viinjârd
    šinjârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiinjârd
    suonjârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: suonjârd
    mullârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: muullârd
    molârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: moolârd
    kiemârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiemârd
    kašmârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaašmârd
    šumpârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šuumpârd
    visârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viisârd
    snuotârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: snuotârd
    skitârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiittârd
    hutârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuttârd
    čevârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čeevârd
    livârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: liivârd
    čievârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čievvârd
    skiđârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skiiđârd
    siđârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siiđârd
    njočârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njooččârd
    čučârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuuččârd
    juárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juárbud
    čuárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárbud
    njárbudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: njáárbud
    iäddudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iäddud
    iädudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iäddud
    puáidudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáidud
    jáldudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jááldud
    iärdudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iärdud
    hávdudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háávdud
    pággudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pággud
    čuágudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuággud
    viäigudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viäigud
    tiälgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiälgud
    viälgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: viälgud
    šiälgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: šiälgud
    kuárgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuárgud
    čuárgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuárgud
    árgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: áárgud
    kuávgudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuávgud
    pahudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paahud
